Illinois, session 104th, SB269.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding the Article XLVIII as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)7ARTICLE XLVIII. INSURANCE RATE TRANSPARENCY 8    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)9    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 10Insurance Rate Transparency Law. 11    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)12    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Law is to increase 13transparency in the insurance market by requiring insurers to 14disclose year-over-year rate changes for automobile insurance 15policies and homeowners insurance policies both online and in 16mailed policy renewal notices and empowering consumers to make 17informed decisions. 18    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)19    Sec. 1810. Definitions. As used in this Law:20    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.  SB0269- 2 -LRB104 08729 BAB 18783 b1    "Director" means the Director of Insurance.2    "Insurer" means an insurance company offering homeowners 3insurance policies or automobile insurance policies within the 4State. 5    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)6    Sec. 1815. Disclosure requirements.7    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, each insurer shall maintain 8a publicly accessible website displaying a summary of the 9annual percentage increase or decrease in premium rates for 10homeowners insurance policies and automobile insurance 11policies.12    (b) The website must display the rate-change data for the 13previous 5 years, updated annually by no later than January 31 14of each year.15    (c) The disclosed data shall include the following 16information:17        (1) the average annual percentage change in premium 18    rates for all policyholders statewide;19        (2) a breakdown of the rate changes for automobile 20    insurance and homeowners insurance policies; and21        (3) a clear explanation of the primary factors 22    contributing to the rate changes.23    (d) The disclosure must be presented in at least 14-point 24font size to ensure readability.25    (e) Insurers must include the 5-year rate-change summary   SB0269- 3 -LRB104 08729 BAB 18783 b1in all mailed renewal notices sent to policyholders, even if 2the insured has otherwise opted out of paper communications.3    (f) No information other than the rate-change summary 4disclosure shall be included in the mailed renewal notice.5    (g) The renewal notice must include the rate-change 6summary on a dedicated website titled "Important Rate 7Information" and use clear language to describe the changes.8    (h) Insurers must provide downloadable reports containing 9the full data for consumers who request more detailed 10information.11    (i) For the convenience of the insured, mailed renewal 12notices must include a QR code linking directly to the online 13rate-change history website. 14    (215 ILCS 5/1820 new)15    Sec. 1820. Enforcement and penalties. 16    (a) The Department shall monitor compliance with this Law 17through periodic audits of insurer websites and mailed 18notices.19    (b) Any insurer found in violation of this Law shall be 20subject to a fine of $25,000 for each month the required 21information is not displayed or is incomplete.22    (c) Repeated violations may result in the suspension of 23the insurer's license to issue new policies in Illinois until 24compliance is achieved.25    (d) Failure to include the disclosure in mailed renewal   SB0269- 4 -LRB104 08729 BAB 18783 b1notices will result in an additional $50,000 fine per 2violation. 3    (215 ILCS 5/1825 new)4    Sec. 1825. Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt 5rules necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of 6this Law. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.